Washington statutes.
RCW 18.25.0171

Commission—Duties and powers—Compensation—Rules.

The commission shall elect officers each year. Meetings of the commission are open to the public, except that the commission may hold executive sessions to the extent permitted by chapter 42.30 RCW. The secretary of health shall furnish such secretarial, clerical, and other assistance as the commission may require.

Each member of the commission shall be compensated in accordance with RCW 43.03.265. Members shall be reimbursed for travel expenses incurred in the actual performance of their duties, as provided in RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060.

A majority of the commission members appointed and serving constitutes a quorum for the transaction of commission business. The affirmative vote of a majority of a quorum of the commission is required to carry a motion or resolution, to adopt a rule, or to pass a measure.

The commission may appoint members of panels of at least three members. A quorum for transaction of any business by a panel is a minimum of three members. A majority vote of a quorum of the panel is required to transact business delegated to it by the commission.

The members of the commission are immune from suit in an action, civil or criminal, based upon its disciplinary proceedings or other official acts performed in good faith as members of the commission.

The commission may, whenever the workload of the commission requires, request that the secretary appoint pro tempore members. While serving as members pro tempore persons have all the powers, duties, and immunities, and are entitled to the emoluments, including travel expenses, of the commission.

The commission shall prepare or determine the nature of the examinations for applicants to practice chiropractic.

The commission may adopt such rules as are consistent with this chapter as may be deemed necessary and proper to carry out the purposes of this chapter.

[ 1999 c 366 s 2; 1994 sp.s. c 9 s 107.]